Maryland, session 2026, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1414.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the registered owner
of a motor vehicle shall be liable to the Authority for payment of a video toll as provided for
in the regulations of the Authority.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1200*

HOUSE BILL 1200
(2) The Authority shall send the registered owner of a motor vehicle that
has incurred a video toll a notice of toll due.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the person alleged
to be liable who receives a notice of toll due shall have at least 30 days to pay the video toll.
(4) To mail the notice of toll due, the Authority shall use:
(i) The current mailing address on file with the Administration; or
(ii) If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
(c) (1) Failure of the person alleged to be liable to pay the video toll under a
notice of toll due by the date stated on the notice shall constitute a toll violation subject to
a civil citation and a civil penalty, which shall be assessed 15 days after the toll violation
occurs, as provided for in the regulations of the Authority.
(2) A registered owner of a motor vehicle shall not be liable for a civil
penalty imposed under this section if the operator of the motor vehicle has been convicted
of failure or refusal to pay a toll under § 21–1413 of this subtitle for the same violation.
(g) (1) If, at the time of a video toll transaction, a motor vehicle is operated by
a person other than the registered owner without the express or implied consent of the
registered owner, and if the registered owner by the date stated on the notice of toll due
provides the Authority or its duly authorized agent with a notarized admission by the
person accepting liability which shall include that person’s name, address, and driver’s
license identification number, then the person accepting liability shall be liable under this
section and shall be sent a notice of toll due.
(2) If the registered owner is a lessor of motor vehicles, and at the time of
the video toll transaction the motor vehicle involved was in the possession of a lessee, and
the lessor, by the date stated on the notice of toll due, provides the Authority or its duly
authorized agent with a copy of the lease agreement or other documentation acceptable to
the Authority identifying the lessee, including the person’s name, address, and driver’s
license identification number or federal employer identification number, then the lessee
shall be liable under this section and shall be sent a notice of toll due.
(3) If the motor vehicle involved in a video toll transaction is operated using
a dealer or transporter registration plate, and at the time of the video toll transaction the
motor vehicle was under the custody and control of a person other than the owner of the
dealer or transporter registration plate, and if the owner of the dealer or transporter
registration plate, by the date stated on the notice of toll due, provides to the Authority or
its duly authorized agent a copy of the contractual agreement or other documentation
acceptable to the Authority identifying the person, including the person’s name, address,
and driver’s license identification number, who had custody and control over the motor

HOUSE BILL 1200 3
vehicle at the time of the video toll transaction, then that person and not the owner of the
dealer or transporter registration plate shall be liable under this section and shall be sent
a notice of toll due.
(4) If a motor vehicle or registration plate number is reported to a law
enforcement agency as stolen at the time of the video toll transaction, and the registered
owner, by the date stated on the notice of toll due, provides to the Authority or its duly
authorized agent a copy of the police report substantiating that the motor vehicle was stolen
at the time of the video toll transaction, then the registered owner of the motor vehicle is
not liable under this section.
(5) IF, AT THE TIME OF A VIDEO TOLL TRANSACTION, A MOTOR
VEHICLE IS OPERATED BY THE REGISTERED OWNER OR A PERSON TRANSPORTING
THE REGISTERED OWNER, AND THE REGISTERED OWNER, BY THE DATE STATED ON
THE NOTICE OF TOLL DUE, PROVIDES THE AUTHORITY OR ITS DULY AUTHORIZED
AGENT WITH MEDICAL DOCUMENTATION FROM A LICENSED HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER SUBSTANTIATING THAT THE REGISTERED OWNER IS BETWEEN
SCHEDULED CANCER TREATMENTS AS PART OF AN ONGOING COURSE OF
TREATMENT AT THE TIME OF THE VIDEO TOLL TRANSACTION, THE REGISTERED
OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.